Utah statutes.
11-17-20 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Power of the Utah Charter School Finance Authority.

(1)  The Utah Charter School Finance Authority may exercise the powers granted to municipalities and counties by this chapter, subject to the same limitations as that imposed on a municipality or county under the chapter, except as provided by Title 53A, Chapter 20b, Part 1, Utah Charter School Finance Authority Act.

(2)  As used in this chapter, "governing body" when applied to the Utah Charter School Finance Authority means the authority's governing board as described in Section 53A-20b-103.

(3)  Notwithstanding Section 11-17-15, a charter school that receives financing under this chapter is subject to Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code.

